Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.420.030

Licensure not under the compact.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 28A.420.020, nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit or inhibit the power of a member state to regulate licensure or endorsements overseen by the member state's licensing authority.

(2) When a teacher is required to renew a license received pursuant to this compact, the state granting such a license may require the teacher to complete state specific requirements as a condition of licensure renewal or advancement in that state.

(3) For the purposes of determining compensation, a receiving state may require additional information from teachers receiving a license under the provisions of this compact.

(4) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its information pertaining to teachers, or limit the application of a member state's laws or regulations governing the ownership, use, or dissemination of information pertaining to teachers.

(5) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or alter any existing agreement or other cooperative arrangement which a member state may already be a party to, or limit the ability of a member state to participate in any future agreement or other cooperative arrangement to:

(a) Award teaching licenses or other benefits based on additional professional credentials including, but not limited to, national board certification;

(b) Participate in the exchange of names of teachers whose license has been subject to an adverse action by a member state; or

(c) Participate in any agreement or cooperative arrangement with a nonmember state.

[ 2024 c 317 s 4.]